zh-TW: 硬體 > 硬體配件 > 標記/警示膠帶: 警示膠帶; 標記膠帶; 標示膠帶
ro-RO: Feronerie > Accesorii de feronerie > Bandă de semnalizare și avertizare: Bandă baricade; Bandă de semnalizare; Bandă de marcare
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์ฮาร์ดแวร์ > เทปแจ้งเตือน: เทปกีดขวาง; เทปติดธง; เทปทำเครื่องหมาย
nb: Maskinvare > Tilbehør til materiell > Advarselstape: Barrikadetape; Flaggetape; Merketape
sv: Metallprodukter > Tillbehör till järnvaror > Markerings- och varningstejp: Barrikadtejp; Flaggningstejp; Markeringstejp
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Kutilství a řemeslo – příslušenství > Výstražné a vytyčovací pásky: Zahrazovací páska; Varovná páska; Označovací páska
es: Bricolaje > Accesorios de bricolaje > Cinta indicadora y de advertencia: Cinta de barricada; Cinta de señalización; Cinta de marcado
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Accessori ferramenta > Nastri segnaletici: Nastro per barricata; Nastro di segnalazione; Nastro di marcatura
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 五金配件 > 警示带: 路障带; 标志带; 标记带
da: Isenkram > Isenkram – tilbehør > Afmærknings- og advarselstape: Barrikadetape; Flagtape; Markeringstape
pt-PT: Equipamento > Acessórios de equipamento > Fita de sinalização e advertência: Fita de barreira; Fita de sinalização; Fita de marcação
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Dodatki za gradbeno opremo > Označevalni in opozorilni trakovi: Zaporni opozorilni trakovi; Signalni trakovi; Označevalni trakovi
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires de quincaillerie > Ruban de signalisation: Rubans de barricade; Rubans de signalisation; Rubans de marquage
vi: Phần cứng > Phụ kiện phần cứng > Băng dính cảnh báo nguy hiểm: Băng rào chắn; Băng gắn cờ; Băng đánh dấu
bg-BG: Железария > Обков и аксесоари > Маркираща и предупредителна лента: Барикадна лента; Предупредителна лента; Маркираща лента
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Αξεσουάρ υλικού > Ταινία επισήμανσης και προειδοποίησης: Ταινία αποκλεισμού/οριοθέτησης; Ταινία σήμανσης σημείων; Ταινία σήμανσης σε επιφάνειες
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Bouwbeslag > Markerings- en waarschuwingstape: Afzettape; Markeringstape voor gevaarlijke gebieden; Markeringstape voor nutsleidingen
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Аксессуары для оборудования и технических изделий > Маркировочная и оградительная лента: Оградительная лента; Идентификационная лента; Маркировочная лента
ko: 철물 > 철물 부대용품 > 경고/주의 테이프: 바리케이드용 테이프; 표시용 비접착 테이프; 표시용 접착 테이프
pt-BR: Ferragens > Acessórios para ferragens > Faixas sinalizadoras e faixas de isolamento: Fita de barricada; Fita de sinalização; Fita de marcação
hu: Hardver > Hardverkiegészítők > Jelző- és figyelmeztetőszalag: Barikádszalag; Jelzőszalag; Jelölőszalag
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Techninės įrangos priedai > Žymėjimo ir įspėjamoji juosta: Signalinė juosta; Ženklinimo juosta; Žymėjimo juosta
hr-HR: Željezarija > Metalni dodaci > Traka za označavanje i upozorenje: Pregradna traka; Traka za označavanje; Traka za obilježavanje
pl: Sprzęt > Akcesoria do sprzętu > Taśmy ostrzegawcze i sygnalizacyjne: Taśma ostrzegawcza; Taśma sygnalizacyjna; Taśma znakująca
sk-SK: Náradie > Príslušenstvo ku kovaniu > Vyznačovacia a výstražná páska: Vymedzovacia páska; Vyznačovacia páska; Značkovacia páska
en: Hardware > Hardware Accessories > Flagging & Caution Tape: Barricade Tape; Flagging Tape; Marking Tape
ja: DIY用品 > DIY小物類 > マーキングテープ・標識テープ: バリケードテープ; フラグテープ; マーキングテープ
tr: Hırdavat > Tesisat Aksesuarları > İşaretleme ve İkaz Bandı: Barikat Bandı; İşaretleme Bandı; İkaz Bandı
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Bauzubehör > Warnklebeband: Absperrband; Kennzeichnungsband; Markierungsband
fi: Rakentaminen > Tarvikkeet > Lippusiima ja varoitusteippi: Esteteippi; Merkitsemisteippi; Merkkiteippi